Utah, session 2026, SB237.
Section 1. Section 53-1-106 is amended to read:53-1-106. Department duties -- Powers.(1)In addition to the responsibilities contained in this title, the department shall:(a)make rules and perform the functions specified in Title 41, Chapter 6a, Traffic Code, including:(i)setting performance standards for towing companies to be used by the department, as required by Section 41-6a-1406; and(ii)advising the Department of Transportation regarding the safe design and operation of school buses, as required by Section 41-6a-1304;(b)make rules to establish and clarify standards pertaining to the curriculum and teaching methods of a motor vehicle accident prevention course under Section 31A-19a-211;(c)aid in enforcement efforts to combat drug trafficking;(d)meet with the Division of Technology Services to formulate contracts, establish priorities, and develop funding mechanisms for dispatch and telecommunications operations;(e)provide assistance to the Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice and the Utah Office for Victims of Crime in conducting research or monitoring victims' programs, as required by Section 63M-7-507;(f)develop sexual assault exam protocol standards in conjunction with the Utah Hospital Association;(g)engage in emergency planning activities, including preparation of policy and procedure and rulemaking necessary for implementation of the federal Emergency Planning and Community Right to Know Act of 1986, as required by Section 53-2a-702;(h)implement the provisions of Section 53-2a-402, the Emergency Management Assistance Compact;(i)ensure that any training or certification required of a public official or public employee, as those terms are defined in Section 63G-22-102, complies with Title 63G, Chapter 22, State Training and Certification Requirements, if the training or certification is required:(i)under this title;(ii)by the department; or(iii)by an agency or division within the department;(j)employ a law enforcement officer as a public safety liaison to be housed at the State Board of Education who shall work with the State Board of Education to:(i)support training with relevant state agencies for school resource officers as described in Section 53G-8-702;(ii)coordinate the creation of model policies and memorandums of understanding for a local education agency and a local law enforcement agency; and(iii)ensure cooperation between relevant state agencies, a local education agency, and a local law enforcement agency to foster compliance with disciplinary related statutory provisions, including Sections 53E-3-516 and 53G-8-211;(k)provide for the security and protection of public officials, public officials' staff, and the capitol hill complex in accordance with the provisions of this part;(l)fulfill the duties described in Sections 77-36-2.1 and 78B-7-120 related to lethality assessments; and(m)fulfill the duties described in Section 63L-13-201 related to restricted foreign entities.(2)(a)The department shall establish a schedule of fees as required or allowed in this title for services provided by the department.(b)All fees not established in statute shall be established in accordance with Section 63J-1-504.(3)The department may establish or contract for the establishment of an Organ Procurement Donor Registry in accordance with Section 26B-8-319.(4)(a)The department and the State Tax Commission shall jointly study the feasibility of combining the motor vehicle-related divisions under a single umbrella agency, including the Driver License Division, the Motor Vehicle Division, and the Motor Vehicle Enforcement Division.(b)The study described in Subsection (4)(a) shall include an evaluation of:(i)potential cost savings, including administrative, operational, and technology-related savings;(ii)potential efficiency gains in governance, staffing, data sharing, and service delivery;(iii)potential improvements to customer experience, including service accessibility, processing times, and coordination of services; and(iv)legal, operational, and fiscal barriers to consolidation.(c)In conducting the study, the department may:(i)consult with employees and leadership of each motor vehicle-related division;(ii)review consolidation and organization models from other states;(iii)consult with relevant stakeholders;(iv)conduct surveys or studies with users and customers; and(v)identify statutory changes that would be required to implement consolidation.(d)On or before November 30, 2026, the department shall submit a written report of the study described in this section to the Transportation Interim Committee.(e)The report required under Subsection (4)(d) shall include:(i)findings and conclusions from the study; and(ii)recommendations, including whether consolidation should be pursued and, if so, an implementation framework.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 63I-2-253 is amended to read:63I-2-253. Repeal dates: Titles 53 through 53G.(1)Subsection 53-1-106(4), with regard to a feasibility study to consolidate motor vehicle-related divisions, is repealed on July 1, 2027.(1)(2)Title 53, Chapter 2c, COVID-19 Health and Economic Response Act, is repealed July 1, 2026.(2)(3)Section 53-22-104.1, School Security Task Force -- Membership -- Duties -- Per diem -- Report -- Expiration, is repealed December 31, 2025.(3)(4)Section 53-22-104.2, The School Security Task Force -- Education Advisory Board, is repealed December 31, 2025.(4)(5)Section 53-25-103, Airport dangerous weapon possession reporting requirements, is repealed December 31, 2031.(5)(6)Subsection 53-25-602(4)(b), regarding the rights of a peace officer placed onto a prosecution agency's Brady identification system before May 7, 2025, is repealed December 1, 2025.(6)(7)Subsection 53-29-302(2)(b)(ii), regarding the requirement for the Department of Corrections to submit the results of risk assessments for sex offenders to the State Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice, is repealed January 1, 2030.(7)(8)Subsection 53E-3-501(7)(e)(ii), regarding a report on the packet method, is repealed July 1, 2028.(8)(9)Subsection 53F-2-504(6), regarding a report on the Salary Supplement for Highly Needed Educators, is repealed July 1, 2026.(9)(10)Section 53F-5-221, Management of energy and water use pilot program, is repealed July 1, 2028.(10)(11)Section 53F-5-222, Mentoring and Supporting Teacher Excellence and Refinement Pilot Program, is repealed July 1, 2028.(11)(12)Section 53F-5-223, Stipends for Future Educators Grant Program, is repealed July 1, 2028.(12)(13)Subsection 53G-11-502(1), regarding implementation of the educator evaluation process, is repealed July 1, 2029.(13)(14)Section 53G-11-506, Establishment of educator evaluation program -- Joint committee, is repealed July 1, 2029.(14)(15)Section 53G-11-507, Components of educator evaluation program, is repealed July 1, 2029.(15)(16)Section 53G-11-508, Summative evaluation timelines -- Review of summative evaluations, is repealed July 1, 2029.(16)(17)Section 53G-11-509, Mentor for provisional educator, is repealed July 1, 2029.(17)(18)Section 53G-11-510, State board to describe a framework for the evaluation of educators, is repealed July 1, 2029.(18)(19)Section 53G-11-511, Rulemaking for privacy protection, is repealed July 1, 2029.(19)(20)Subsection 53G-11-520(1), regarding optional alternative educator evaluation processes, is repealed July 1, 2029.(20)(21)Subsection 53G-11-520(2), regarding an exception from educator evaluation process requirements, is repealed July 1, 2029.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.